zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具 > 嬰兒床: 雙層幼兒床; 遮光罩幼兒床; 閣樓風嬰兒床; 迷你嬰兒床; 雪橇嬰兒床; 標準嬰兒床; 嬰兒睡床; 旅行嬰兒床
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture > Cribs & Toddler Beds: Bunk Toddler Beds; Canopy Toddler Beds; Loft Toddler Beds; Mini Cribs; Sleigh Toddler Beds; Standard Cribs; Toddler Beds; Travel Cribs
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具 > 婴儿床/儿童床: 双层儿童床; 四柱儿童床; 高架儿童床; 迷你婴儿床; 雪橇儿童床; 标准婴儿床; 儿童床; 旅行婴儿床
ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев > Кровати для детей и младенцев: Двухъярусные детские кровати; Детские кровати с балдахином; Детские кровати-чердаки; Мини-кровати для младенцев; Детские кровати с изголовьем и изножьем; Стандартные детские кровати; Детские кровати; Детские кровати для путешествий
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Cũi và giường cho trẻ: Giường tầng cho trẻ; Giường có màn quây quanh cho trẻ; Giường gác xép cho trẻ; Nôi mini; Giường hình xe trượt tuyết cho trẻ; Nôi thông dụng; Giường cho trẻ; Nôi du lịch
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具 > ベビーベッド: 二段幼児用ベッド; 天蓋付き幼児用ベッド; ロフト幼児用ベッド; ミニベビーベッド; そり幼児用ベッド; 標準ベビーベッド; 幼児用ベッド; トラベル用ベビーベッド
ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Pătuțuri și paturi pentru copii mici: Paturi supraetajate pentru copii mici; Paturi cu baldachin pentru copii mici; Paturi etajate pentru copii mici; Mini-pătuțuri; Paturi etajate tip sanie pentru copii mici; Pătuțuri standard; Paturi pentru copii mici; Pătuțuri de călătorie
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters > Peuter- en kinderbedjes: Peuterstapelbedjes; Peuterhemelbedjes; Peuterloftbedjes; Minikinderbedjes; Peutersleebedjes; Standaard kinderbedjes; Peuterbedjes; Reiskinderbedjes
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok > Detské postieľky: Poschodové detské postele; Detské postele s baldachýnom; Podkrovné detské postele; Mini postieľky; Detské postele so zábranou; Štandardné detské postieľky; Detské postieľky; Cestovné postieľky
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца > Бебешки легла и легла за малки деца: Двуетажни легла за малки деца; Легла с балдахин за малки деца; Тавански легла за малки деца; Мини кошарки; Легла с прегради; Стандартни кошари; Легла за малки деца; Сгъваеми кошари
hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu > Krevetići i kreveti za malu djecu: Kreveti na kat za malu djecu; Kreveti s baldahinom za malu djecu; Povišeni kreveti za malu djecu; Mini krevetići; Kreveti u obliku saonica za malu djecu; Standardni krevetići; Kreveti za malu djecu; Putni krevetići
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi > Lettini e letti per bimbi: Letti a castello per bambini; Letti per bambini a baldacchino; Letti per bambini a soppalco; Mini lettini; Lettini per bambini a slitta; Lettini standard; Letti per bambini; Lettini da viaggio
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt > Łóżeczka i łóżka dziecinne: Piętrowe łóżka dziecinne; Łóżka dziecinne z baldachimem; Łóżka dziecinne na antresoli; Miniłóżeczka; Łóżka dziecinne w kształcie sań; Standardowe łóżeczka; Łóżka dla dzieci; Łóżeczka podróżne
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları > Bebek Karyolaları ve Küçük Çocuk Yatakları: Ranza Bebek Yatakları; Kanopi Bebek Yatakları; Loft Bebek Yatakları; Mini Beşikler; Kızak Bebek Yatakları; Standart Beşikler; Küçük Çocuk Yatakları; Park Yataklar
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut > Pinnasängyt ja lastensängyt: Lasten kerrossängyt; Katetut lastensängyt; Lasten parvisängyt; Minipinnasängyt; Lasten rekisängyt; Tavalliset pinnasängyt; Lastensängyt; Matkapinnasängyt
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence > Ohrádky a dětské postýlky: Dvoupatrové dětské postýlky; Dětské postýlky s baldachýnem; Patrové dětské postýlky; Dětské mini postýlky; Dětské postýlky se zaoblenými čely; Standardní dětské postýlky; Postýlky pro batolata; Cestovní dětské postýlky
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα > Κούνιες & παιδικά κρεβάτια: Παιδικές κουκέτες; Παιδικά κρεβάτια με ουρανό; Υπερυψωμένα παιδικά κρεβάτια; Κούνιες Mini; Παιδικά κρεβάτια τύπου έλκηθρο; Κανονικές κούνιες; Παιδικά κρεβάτια; Κούνιες ταξιδιού
ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구 > 영유아용 침대: 유아용 벙커 침대; 유아용 캐노피 침대; 유아용 로프트 침대; 영유아용 미니 침대; 유아용 슬레이 침대; 영유아용 표준형 침대; 유아용 침대; 영유아용 여행용 침대
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Supamosios lovytės ir lovytės mažiems vaikams: Dviaukštės lovytės mažiems vaikams; Lovytės mažiems vaikams su baldakimu; Paaukštintos lovytės mažiems vaikams; Supamosios minilovytės mažiems vaikams; Itin žemos lovytės mažiems vaikams; Standartinės supamosios lovytės; Lovytės mažiems vaikams; Kelioninės supamosios lovytės
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke > Otroške posteljice in posteljice za malčke: Dvonadstropne otroške posteljice; Otroške posteljice z baldahinom; Otroške postelje z dvignjenim okvirjem; Mini posteljice; Otroške posteljice z ukrivljeno obliko; Standardne posteljice; Otroške postelje; Potovalne posteljice
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn > Spjälsängar och barnsängar: Våningssängar för småbarn; Himmelsängar för småbarn; Loftsmåbarnssängar; Minispjälsängar; Småbarnsslädsängar; Standardspjälsängar; Småbarnssängar; Resesängar
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits > Lits de bébé: Lits superposés pour tout-petits; Lits à baldaquin pour tout-petits; Lits mezzanine pour tout-petits; Mini-berceaux; Lits traîneau pour tout-petits; Lits de bébé standards; Lits pour tout-petits; Lits de bébé de voyage
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños > Cunas y camas para niños: Literas para niños pequeños; Camas para niños pequeños con dosel; Camas altas para niños pequeños; Minicunas; Camas para niños pequeños en trineo; Cunas estándar; Camas para niños pequeños; Cunas de viaje
de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel > Gitterbetten & Kleinkinderbetten: Etagenbetten für Kleinkinder; Himmelbetten für Kleinkinder; Hochbetten für Kleinkinder; Mini-Gitterbetten; Schlittenbetten für Kleinkinder; Standard-Gitterbetten; Kinderbetten; Reisebetten
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก > ที่นอนเด็กเล็ก: ที่นอนเด็กเล็กสองชั้น; ที่นอนเด็กเล็กแบบมีหลังคา; ที่นอนเด็กเล็กสไตล์ลอฟท์; เตียงนอนเด็กขนาดเล็ก; เตียงเด็กเล็กแบบเลื่อน; เตียงเด็กมาตรฐาน; ที่นอนเด็กเล็ก; เตียงเด็กสำหรับเดินทาง
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês > Berços e camas infantis: Beliches para crianças pequenas; Camas infantis com dossel; Camas elevadas para crianças pequenas; Mini berços; Camas com grades para crianças pequenas; Berços padrão; Camas infantis; Berços de viagem
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn > Vugger og barnesenger: Barnekøyesenger; Barnebaldakinsenger; Loftbarnesenger; Minibarnesenger; Sledebarnesenger; Standardbarnesenger; Småbarnsenger; Reisebarnesenger
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança > Berços e camas de criança: Beliches para crianças pequenas; Camas para crianças pequenas de dossel; Camas altas para crianças pequenas; Miniberços; Camas trenó para crianças pequenas; Berços padrão; Camas para crianças pequenas; Berços de viagem
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn > Tremmesenge og børnesenge: Køjesenge; Børnesenge med baldakin; Køjesenge til loft; Mini tremmesenge; Køjesenge til gulv; Standard tremmesenge; Børnesenge; Rejsesenge
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok > Kiságyak és csecsemőágyak: Emeletes csecsemőágyak; Baldachinos csecsemőágyak; Emelt csecsemőágyak; Mini kiságyak; Szánkós csecsemőágyak; Normál kiságyak; Csecsemőágyak; Utazókiságyak